District of Columbia statutes.
10-1032

Funding.

The functions of this chapter are to be funded in the amounts of $1.8 million in Fiscal Year 2004 and $1.1 million in Fiscal Year 2005 from the Public Planning Capital Project Fund established in § 1-325.11. Of this total amount, not less than $1.2 million shall be made available to the Department of General Services (“Department”), in consultation with the Office of Planning, for the development of a facility inventory and conditions assessment. Other amounts as required shall be transferred to the Department and other District agencies for the fulfillment of the provisions of this chapter. In all cases, this work shall be performed without the use of contractors, except where specialized expertise or expedited effort is required.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1403, 50 DCR 5668
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 71, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services (’Department’)” for “Office of Property Management (’OPM’)” in the second sentence; and substituted “the Department” for “OPM” in the third sentence.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1403 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of the Office of Property Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-121, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6616).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1403 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).